California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(B) Applicable health care services appropriately provided through video synchronous interaction, asynchronous store and forward, audio-only synchronous interaction, remote patient monitoring, or other permissible virtual communication modalities are subject to billing, reimbursement, and utilization management policies imposed by the
 department. Subject to subdivision (k), utilization management protocols adopted by the department pursuant to this section shall be consistent with, and no more restrictive than, those authorized for health care service plans pursuant to Section 1374.13 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) (1) (A) Pursuant to an effective date designated by the department that is no sooner than January 1, 2024, a Medi-Cal provider furnishing applicable health care services via audio-only synchronous interaction shall also offer those same health care services via video synchronous interaction to preserve beneficiary choice.

(B) (i) The department may provide specific exceptions to the requirement specified in subparagraph (A), based on a
 Medi-Cal provider’s access to requisite technologies, which shall be developed in consultation with affected stakeholders and published in departmental guidance.

(ii) In making exceptions to the requirement specified in subparagraph (A), in addition to the provisions in clause (i), the department may also take into consideration the availability of broadband access based on speed standards set by the Federal Communications Commission, pursuant to Section 706 of the Telecommunications Act of 1996 (Pub. L. No. 104-104) or other applicable federal law or regulation.

(2) Effective on the date designated by the department pursuant to paragraph (1), a provider furnishing services through video synchronous interaction or audio-only synchronous interaction shall also maintain
 and follow protocols to do one of the following:

(A) Offer those services via in-person, face-to-face contact.

(B) (i) Arrange for a referral to, and a facilitation of, in-person care that does not require a patient to independently contact a different provider to arrange for that care.

(ii) Clause (i) does not require a provider to schedule an appointment with a different provider on behalf of a patient.

(3) In implementing this subdivision, the department shall consider additional recommendations from affected stakeholders regarding the need to maintain access to in-person services without unduly restricting
 access to telehealth services.

(4) A health care provider may establish a new patient relationship with a Medi-Cal beneficiary via video synchronous interaction consistent with any requirements imposed by the department.

(5) (A) A health care provider shall not establish a new patient relationship with a Medi-Cal beneficiary via asynchronous store and forward, telephonic (audio-only) synchronous interaction, remote patient monitoring, or other virtual communication modalities, except as set forth in paragraph (4) of subdivision (g) of Section 14132.100.

(B) Notwithstanding the prohibition in subparagraph (A), the department may provide for specific exceptions to this prohibition, the
 department may provide for specific exceptions described in clauses (i) and (ii), which shall be developed in consultation with affected stakeholders and published in departmental guidance.

(i) Notwithstanding the prohibition in subparagraph (A), a health care provider may establish a new patient relationship using an audio-only synchronous interaction when the visit is related to sensitive services, as defined in subdivision (p) of Section 56.05 of the Civil Code, and when established in accordance with
 department-specific requirements and consistent with federal and state law, regulations, and guidance.

(ii) Notwithstanding the prohibition in subparagraph (A), a health care provider may establish a new patient relationship using an audio-only synchronous interaction when the patient requests an audio-only modality or attests they do not have access to video, and when established in accordance with department-specific requirements and consistent with federal and state laws, regulations, and guidance.

(6) Subject to subdivision (k), the department may establish separate fee schedules for applicable health care services delivered via remote patient monitoring or other permissible virtual communication modalities.

(7) This subdivision does not apply to Medi-Cal covered services delivered by providers via any telehealth modality to eligible inmates in state prisons, county jails, or youth correctional facilities.

(d) In addition to any existing law requiring beneficiary consent
 to telehealth, including, but not limited to, subdivision (b) of Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code, all of the following shall be communicated by a health care provider to a Medi-Cal beneficiary, in writing or verbally, on at least one occasion prior to, or concurrent with, initiating the delivery of one or more health care services via telehealth to a Medi-Cal beneficiary: an explanation that beneficiaries have the right to access covered services that may be delivered via telehealth through an in-person, face-to-face visit; an explanation that use of telehealth is voluntary and that consent for the use of telehealth can be withdrawn at any time by the Medi-Cal beneficiary without affecting their ability to access covered Medi-Cal services in the future; an explanation of the availability of Medi-Cal coverage for transportation services to in-person visits when other
 available resources have been reasonably exhausted; and the potential limitations or risks related to receiving services through telehealth as compared to an in-person visit, to the extent any limitations or risks are identified by the provider.

(1) The provider shall document in the patient record the provision of this information and the patient’s verbal or written acknowledgment that the information was received.

(2) The department shall develop, in consultation with affected stakeholders, model language for purposes of the communication described in this subdivision.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to Medi-Cal covered services delivered by providers via any telehealth modality to eligible inmates in state
 prisons, county jails, or youth correctional facilities.

(e) (1) The department shall develop, in consultation with affected stakeholders, an informational notice to be distributed to fee-for-service Medi-Cal beneficiaries and for use by Medi-Cal managed care plans in communicating to their enrollees. Information in the notice shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The availability of Medi-Cal covered telehealth services.

(B) The beneficiary’s right to access all medically necessary covered services through in-person, face-to-face visits, and a provider’s and Medi-Cal managed care plan’s responsibility to offer or arrange for that in-person care, as applicable.

(C) An explanation that use of telehealth is voluntary and that consent for the use of telehealth can be withdrawn by the Medi-Cal beneficiary at any time without affecting their ability to access covered Medi-Cal services in the future.

(D) An explanation of the availability of Medi-Cal coverage for transportation services to in-person visits when other available resources have been reasonably exhausted.

(E) Notification of the beneficiary’s right to make complaints about the offer of telehealth services in lieu of in-person care or about the quality of care delivered through telehealth.

(2) The informational notice shall be translated into threshold languages
 determined by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14029.91 and provided in a format that is culturally and linguistically appropriate.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to Medi-Cal covered services delivered by providers via any telehealth modality to eligible inmates in state prisons, county jails, or youth correctional facilities.

(f) (1) Subject to subdivision (k), the department shall reimburse health care providers of applicable health care services delivered via video synchronous interaction, synchronous audio-only modality, or asynchronous store and forward, as applicable, at payment amounts that are not less than the amounts the provider would receive if the services were delivered via in-person, face-to-face contact, so long as
 the services or settings meet the applicable standard of care and meet the requirements of the service code being billed.

(2) Subject to subdivision (k), for applicable health care services appropriately provided by a network provider via video synchronous interaction, audio-only synchronous interaction modality, or asynchronous store and forward, as applicable, to an enrollee of a Medi-Cal managed care plan, the Medi-Cal managed care plan shall reimburse the network provider at payment amounts that are not less than the amounts the network provider would have received if the services were delivered via in-person, face-to-face contact, unless the Medi-Cal managed care plan and network provider mutually agree to reimbursement in different amounts.

(g) On or before January 1,
 2023, the department shall develop a research and evaluation plan that does all of the following:

(1) Proposes strategies to analyze the relationship between telehealth and the following: access to care, access to in-person care, quality of care, and Medi-Cal program costs, utilization, and program integrity.

(2) Examines issues using an equity framework that includes stratification by available geographic and demographic factors, including, but not limited to, race, ethnicity, primary language, age, and gender, to understand inequities and disparities in care.

(3) Prioritizes research and evaluation questions that directly inform Medi-Cal policy.

(h) Applicable health care services provided through asynchronous store and forward, video synchronous interaction, audio-only synchronous interaction, remote patient monitoring, or other permissible virtual communication modalities as described in this section shall comply with the privacy and security requirements contained in the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 found in Parts 160 and 164 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the Medicaid State Plan, and any other applicable state and federal statutes and regulations.

(i) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, and make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, provider bulletins, and
 similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(j) Consistent with the requirements of this section and subject to subdivision (k), a PACE organization approved by the department pursuant to Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591) may use video telehealth to conduct initial assessments and annual reassessments for eligibility for enrollment in the PACE program.

(k) The department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary to implement this section. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(l) This section shall be operative on January 1,
 2023, or on the operative date or dates reflected in the applicable federal approvals obtained by the department pursuant to subdivision (k), whichever is later.

(m) This section does not apply to health care services provided via telehealth in an FQHC or RHC visit as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (g) of Section 14132.100.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 172, Sec. 1.   (AB 1241)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally operative on or after January 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.726.

(a) (1) Commencing in 2028 and every two years thereafter, the department shall use Medi-Cal data and other data sources available to the department to produce analyses in a publicly available Medi-Cal telehealth utilization report.

(2) The department may include the analyses described in paragraph (1) in each of the department’s Biennial Telehealth Utilization Reports. A report described in paragraph (1) may be an update to the department’s Biennial Telehealth Utilization
 Report, if the department continues to publish that report since its inception in 2024, or it may be a different applicable report published by the department.

(b) The analyses described in subdivision (a) shall address telehealth access and utilization data, including all of the following:

(1) Telehealth visits per 100,000 Medi-Cal member months. This information shall be disaggregated by demographics and other metrics, including, but not limited to, age group, race and ethnicity, sex, primary language, county, county size, aid code group, and Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(2) Telehealth visits and all outpatient visits.

(3) Commonly utilized Current
 Procedural Terminology (CPT) codes for outpatient telehealth visits.

(4) Percentage of Medi-Cal members by number of telehealth claims.

(5) Utilization of telehealth by Medi-Cal members with multiple claims with a higher-than-average rate of use. This information shall be disaggregated by demographics and other metrics, including, but not limited to, age group, race and ethnicity, sex, primary language, aid code group, and number and percentage of telehealth utilizers per reporting period.

(6) Telehealth visits of specialty mental health services and nonspecialty mental health services.

(7) Telehealth visits of outpatient dental services.

(8) New patient telehealth claims utilization by modality mix.

(9) Established patient telehealth claims utilization by modality mix.

(10) Commonly utilized medical outpatient health services delivered via telehealth.

(11) Telehealth visits as a percentage of all medical outpatient health services.

(c) (1) Wherever possible based on the availability of data, the analyses described in subdivision (a) shall be disaggregated by geographic, demographic, and social determinants of health categories to identify disparities.

(2) Social determinants of health categories may be approximated using existing data sources, including the Healthy Places Index or similar indices.

(d) In addition to the data elements described in subdivision (b), the department shall identify other data elements, including, but not limited to, data on patient outcomes and population health, for inclusion in future reports to help to identify and address access-to-care issues or provide greater insight into utilization of telehealth modalities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 437, Sec. 2.   (AB 688)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.73.

The State Department of Health Care Services shall allow psychiatrists to receive fee-for-service Medi-Cal reimbursement for services provided through telehealth in accordance with the Medicaid state plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 782, Sec. 13.   (AB 1733)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.731.

(a) A county that enters into a Drug Medi-Cal Treatment Program contract with the department in accordance with Section 14124.20, or the department if entering into a Drug Medi-Cal Treatment Program contract directly with providers or as otherwise described in Section 14124.21, shall reimburse Drug Medi-Cal certified providers for medically necessary Drug Medi-Cal reimbursable services, as defined in Section 14124.24, provided by a licensed practitioner of the healing arts, or a registered or certified alcohol or other drug counselor or other individual authorized by the department to provide Drug Medi-Cal reimbursable services when those services meet the standard of care, meet the requirements of the service code being billed, and are delivered through video synchronous interaction or audio-only
 synchronous interaction.

(b) A Drug Medi-Cal certified provider shall not establish a new patient relationship with a Medi-Cal beneficiary via asynchronous store and forward, audio-only synchronous interaction, remote patient monitoring, or other virtual communication modalities, except as set forth in paragraph (4) of subdivision (g) of Section 14132.100. Notwithstanding this prohibition, the department may provide for specific exceptions to this prohibition, which shall be developed in consultation with affected stakeholders and published in departmental guidance.

(c) Drug Medi-Cal reimbursable services provided through a video synchronous interaction or an audio-only synchronous interaction pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be subject to billing, reimbursement, and utilization management policies imposed by the department.

(d) Drug Medi-Cal reimbursable services provided through a video synchronous interaction or an audio-only synchronous interaction shall be provided in compliance with the privacy and security requirements contained in the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 found in Parts 160 and 164 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, Part 2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the Medicaid State Plan, and any other applicable state and federal statutes and regulations.

(e) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available.

(f) The department shall adopt regulations by July 1, 2024, to implement this section in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of
 Title 2 of the Government Code).

(g) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, the department may, if it deems it appropriate, implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of provider bulletins, written guidelines, or similar instructions from the department, until regulations are adopted.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 101.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.74.

(a) The department, in consultation with interested stakeholders, shall develop, as a pilot project, a pediatric palliative care benefit to evaluate whether, and to what extent, such a benefit should be offered under the Medi-Cal program. The pilot project shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(b) Beneficiaries eligible to receive the pediatric palliative care benefit shall be under 21 years of age. The department may
 further limit the population served by the pilot project to a size deemed sufficient to make the evaluation required pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Services covered under the pediatric palliative care benefit shall be designed to meet the unique needs of children, and shall include those types of services that are available through the Medi-Cal hospice benefit. The benefit shall also include the following services, regardless of whether those services are covered under the Medi-Cal hospice benefit:

(1) Hospice services that are provided at the same time that curative treatment is available, to the extent that the services are not duplicative.

(2) Hospice services provided to individuals whose conditions may result in death, regardless of the estimated length of the individual’s remaining period of life.

(3) Any other services that the department determines to be appropriate.

(d) The department, in consultation with interested stakeholders, shall determine the medical conditions and prognoses that render a beneficiary eligible for the benefit.

(e) Providers authorized to provide services under the pilot program shall include licensed hospice agencies and home health agencies licensed to provide hospice care, subject to criteria developed by the department for provider participation.

(f) (1) The department shall submit any necessary application to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for a waiver to implement the pilot project described in this section. The department shall determine the form of waiver most
 appropriate to achieve the purposes of this section. The waiver request shall be included in any waiver application submitted within 12 months after the effective date of this section, or shall be submitted as an independent application within that time period. After federal approval is secured, the department shall implement the waiver within 12 months of the date of approval.

(2) The waiver shall be designed to cover a period of time necessary to evaluate the medical necessity for, and cost-effectiveness of, a pediatric palliative care benefit. The results of the pilot project shall be made available to the Legislature and appropriate policy and fiscal committees to determine the effectiveness of the benefit.

(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement the provisions of
 this section by means of provider bulletins or similar instructions, without the adoption of regulations. The department shall notify the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature of its intent to issue a provider bulletin or other similar instruction at least five days prior to issuance.

(h) (1) Nothing in this section shall result in the elimination or reduction of any covered benefits or services under the Medi-Cal program or the California Children’s Services Program.

(2) This section shall not affect an individual’s eligibility to receive, concurrently with the benefit provided for in this section, any services, including home health services, for which the individual would have been eligible in the absence of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 330, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.75.

(a) In enacting this section, it is the intent of the Legislature that palliative care include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Specialized medical care and emotional and spiritual support for people with serious advanced illnesses.

(2) Relief of symptoms, pain, and stress of serious illness.

(3) Improvement of quality of life for both the patient and family.

(4) Appropriate care for any age and for any stage of serious illness, along with curative treatment.

(b) The department, in consultation with interested stakeholders, shall establish standards and provide technical assistance for Medi-Cal managed care plans to ensure delivery of palliative care services.

(c) Covered services shall include, but are not limited to, those types of services that are available through the Medi-Cal hospice
 benefit. These services shall include the following, regardless of whether these services are covered under the Medi-Cal hospice benefit:

(1) Hospice services that are provided at the same time that curative
 treatment is available, to the extent that the services are not duplicative.

(2) Hospice services provided to individuals whose conditions may result in death, regardless of the estimated length of the individual’s remaining period of life.

(3) Any other services that the department determines to be appropriate.

(d) The department, in consultation with interested stakeholders, shall establish guidance on the medical conditions and prognoses that render a beneficiary eligible
 for the
 palliative care services.

(e) Providers authorized to provide services shall include licensed hospice agencies and home health agencies licensed to provide hospice care that are contracted with Medi-Cal managed care plans to provide palliative care services.

(f) The department shall, to the extent practicable,
 ensure that the delivery of palliative care services under this section is provided in a manner that is cost neutral to the General Fund on an ongoing basis.

(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement the provisions of this section by means of
 all plan letters or similar instructions, without the adoption of regulations. The department shall notify stakeholders and the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature of its intent to issue all plan letters or other similar instructions prior to issuance.

(h) (1) Nothing in this section shall result in the elimination or reduction of any covered benefits or
 services under the Medi-Cal program.

(2) This section shall not affect an individual’s eligibility to receive, concurrently with the services provided for in this section, any services, including home health services, for which the individual would have been eligible in the absence of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   (SB 1004)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.755.

(a) Commencing no sooner than July 1, 2022, dyadic behavioral health visits shall be a covered benefit under the Medi-Cal program, subject to utilization controls.

(b) The dyadic services benefit is a family- and caregiver-focused model of care intended to address developmental and behavioral health conditions of children as soon as they are identified, and that fosters access to preventive care for children, rates of immunization completion, coordination of care, child social-emotional health and safety, developmentally appropriate parenting, and maternal mental health. Dyadic behavioral health visits are provided for the child and caregiver or parent at medical visits, providing screening for behavioral health problems, interpersonal
 safety, tobacco and substance misuse and social determinants of health, such as food insecurity and housing instability, and referrals for appropriate followup care.

(c) This section shall be implemented only to the extent any necessary federal approvals are obtained, and federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletins, plan letters, information notices, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 392.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.76.

(a) An individual who is determined to be eligible to receive hospice services prior to 21 years of age may continue to receive hospice services after 21 years of age when certified as eligible by a physician in accordance with section 1905(o) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(o)).

(b) An individual who is determined to be eligible to receive palliative care services prior to 21 years of age may continue to receive medically necessary palliative care services after 21 years of age when determined to be eligible by the recipient’s treating health care provider.

(c) The department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary to implement this section. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal
 approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 814, Sec. 3.   (AB 847)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.765.

(a) No treatment authorization request shall be required for the provision of prosthetic devices or for the replacement or repair of prosthetic devices, if the cost does not exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

(b) No treatment authorization request shall be required for the provision of orthotic devices or for the replacement or repair of orthotic devices, if the cost does not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(c) The department shall implement subdivisions (a) and (b) commencing March 1, 1994.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), the department shall implement subdivisions (a) and (b) only if one of the following occurs:

(1) The report required by Section 14132.76 contains a conclusion that the pilot demonstration program required by that section was cost-effective.

(2) The report required by Section 14132.76 is not submitted to the appropriate committees of the Legislature by December 31, 1993.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the director may reinstate the requirement for prior authorization if the director determines that the elimination of the requirement results in unnecessary utilization, after notice to the Joint Legislative
 Budget Committee 30 days prior to the reinstatement of the requirement for prior authorization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.77.

(a) (1) Any rural hospital may request to participate in a two-year pilot project to perform delegated acute inpatient hospital treatment authorization review under the Medi-Cal program.

(2) Any hospital that elects to participate in the pilot project under this section shall enter into an agreement with the department to ensure the appropriateness of the treatments and services that it provides to a Medi-Cal beneficiary.

(3) Any rural hospital that elects to participate in a pilot project pursuant to this section shall remain in the project for not less than one year, unless it is removed by the department pursuant to subdivision (c).

(b) The department shall review, on a random basis, every six months, up to 25 percent of the Medi-Cal beneficiaries treated by each participating hospital. As long as a hospital participates in a pilot project authorized by this section, reviews required by this section shall not interfere with, or delay, the processing of the hospital’s claims for payment. Consistent with subdivision (c), if the department finds that a hospital participating in a pilot project under this section is accumulating a significant overpayment, the department shall notify the provider.

(c) (1) (A) If the department determines, as a result of a review required by subdivision (b), that the hospital has provided treatment that cannot be approved by the department, the department shall take an immediate disallowance that shall require offsets against pending Medi-Cal payments and any direct payment that may be required by the department. The disallowance shall be based on full extrapolation of the sample to the universe of Medi-Cal days covered by the sample period.

(B) In addition to the requirements of subparagraph (A), if the department determines that the hospital has provided treatment that cannot be approved by the department for 3 percent or more of the Medi-Cal beneficiary days, the department shall take corrective action relative to the hospital’s participation in the pilot project. The corrective action shall include at least one of the following actions:

(i) The revocation of the hospital’s participation pursuant to subdivision (a).

(ii) An increased random review process.

(iii) Mandatory educational programs.

(2) After the random review required by subdivision (b), the hospital shall, through the reduction of the regularly scheduled periodic interim payment over a one-year period, pay the state an amount equal to the reimbursement received by the hospital for services for which approval has been denied and extrapolated pursuant to paragraph (1). This paragraph does not preclude any hospital from appealing a determination of the department under Article 5.3 (commencing with Section 14170). However, any issue under appeal shall not delay any disallowance or corrective action taken by the department under paragraph (1) until the appeal is resolved.

(d) The department may reinstate any hospital’s participation revoked pursuant to subdivision (c) if, after a period of three months, the hospital’s requests for a treatment authorization are not denied in 3 percent or more of the Medi-Cal days.

(e) Six months after the conclusion of the first year of the pilot project, the department shall prepare a report with an evaluation of the project and shall submit it to the appropriate committees of the Legislature. The department shall include its determination as to whether the project should be extended, modified, or terminated in the report and the basis for any determinations made by the department.

(f) (1) As part of the pilot project implemented under this section, the department may, subject to federal approval, authorize the reimbursement of a
 participating rural hospital at a predetermined amount every two weeks or on some other basis determined to be appropriate by the department. Following every six-month period, the department shall immediately begin adjustment of any overpayment or underpayment, based on the amount paid to the provider as compared to the actual amount of claims approved by the department. Any hospital that is selected to participate in the pilot project under this section that elects to be paid for acute inpatient services under this subdivision shall be subject to the payment provisions of this section for the duration of the hospital’s participation in the pilot project.

(2) The amount of reimbursement under paragraph (1) shall be based on the actual claims payment experience for each hospital for the immediately preceding period of six months and rate adjustments made in accordance with existing Medi-Cal reimbursement requirements.

(g) For purposes of this section, “rural hospital” means a small and rural hospital as defined in Section 124840 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) The scope of the pilot project shall be subject to federal approval and the necessary resources made available from sources other than the General Fund or savings from program efficiencies that may be identified for this purpose.

(i) The department shall implement this section only upon receipt of all appropriate federal waivers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 477.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.8.

Services covered under this chapter shall include rehabilitative services for the physically or cognitively impaired stroke patient, or a patient who has brain injury for whom the medical prognosis and signs indicate potential for faster or more complete recovery, or maintenance or prevention of degeneration, in a variety of situations, including acute inpatient intensive rehabilitation immediately after the occurrence of stroke or injury, inpatient maintenance for the chronically impaired in a hospital or long-term care facility, outpatient services in a rehabilitation clinic or an adult day health care center, and in-home care or home health agency
 services for the patient at home.

Rehabilitative services for the physically or cognitively impaired patient only for those whom the medical prognosis and signs indicate potential for faster or more complete recovery, or maintenance or prevention of degeneration, shall be considered to fall within the definition of medical necessity, as that term is used in Section 14133.3.

For purposes of this section, “brain injury” means clinically evident brain damage resulting directly or indirectly from tumor, trauma, infection, anoxia, or vascular lesions not primarily due to degenerative or aging processes which result in temporary or permanent physical or cognitive deficits.

This section shall not negate the department’s utilization review authority under subdivision (a) of Section 14133.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 258, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.81.

(a) The purchase of identification bracelets for eligible recipients under the Medi-Cal program who have Alzheimer’s Disease or some other cognitive defect, or medication allergies that could be life threatening, shall be a covered benefit under this chapter.

(b) The bracelets shall be purchased from an organization which maintains a 24-hour toll-free telephone number for emergency or medical personnel to make inquiries.

(c) The director shall develop regulations to implement this section.

(d) For purposes of this section “eligible recipients” means those persons who, in addition to qualifying for benefits under this chapter, have been determined by a licensed physician and surgeon to need the benefit authorized by this section.

(e) Benefits shall be provided under this section only to the extent that full federal financial participation is made available.

(f) Benefits shall be provided under this section only when the director determines that two or more organizationally independent providers are available to supply the benefit authorized by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1082, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.85.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Complex needs patient” means an individual with a diagnosis or medical condition that results in significant physical impairment or functional limitation. “Complex needs patient” includes, but is not limited to, individuals with spinal cord injury, traumatic brain injury, cerebral palsy, muscular dystrophy, spina bifida, osteogenesis imperfecta, arthrogryposis, amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, multiple sclerosis, demyelinating disease, myelopathy, myopathy, progressive muscular atrophy, anterior horn cell disease, post-polio syndrome, cerebellar degeneration, dystonia, Huntington’s disease, spinocerebellar disease, and the types of amputation, paralysis, or paresis that result in significant
 physical impairment or functional limitation. “Complex needs patient” does not negate the requirement that an individual meet medical necessity requirements under authority rules to qualify for receiving complex rehabilitation technology.

(2) “Complex rehabilitation technology” means items classified within the federal Medicare Program as of January 1, 2021, as durable medical equipment that are individually configured for individuals to meet their specific and unique medical, physical, and functional needs and capacities for basic activities of daily living and instrumental activities of daily living identified as medically necessary. These items include, but are not limited to, complex rehabilitation manual and power wheelchairs, power seat elevation or power standing components of power wheelchairs, seating and positioning items, other specialized equipment such as adaptive bath equipment, standing frames, gait trainers, and specialized
 strollers, and related options and accessories.

(3) “Complex rehabilitation technology services” includes the application of enabling systems designed and assembled to meet the needs of a patient experiencing any permanent or long-term loss or abnormality of physical or anatomical structure or function with respect to mobility or other function or need. These services include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Evaluating the needs of a patient with a disability, including an assessment of the patient for the purpose of ensuring that the proposed equipment is appropriate.

(B) Documenting medical necessity.

(C) Selecting, fitting, customizing, maintaining, assembling, repairing, replacing, picking up and delivering, and testing equipment
 and parts.

(D) Training the patient who will use the technology or any individual who assists the patient in using the complex rehabilitation technology.
